Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1123
Dentist; resident license; requirements; term; renewal.

(1) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall issue a resident license to any person who (a)(i) presents proof of graduation with a doctorate degree in dental surgery or dental medicine from an accredited school or college of dentistry, (ii) is enrolled in an accredited school or college of dentistry for the purpose of completing a postgraduate or residency program in dentistry, (iii) passes an examination approved by the board, which shall consist of the National Board Dental Examination, Parts I and II, or the Integrated National Board Dental Examination, as constructed and administered by the American Dental Association Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, (iv) passes the practical examination administered by the Central Regional Dental Testing Service, ADEX, or any other regional or state practical examination approved by the board, and (v) passes a jurisprudence examination based on Nebraska law and administrative rules and regulations governing the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene, or (b)(i) is licensed in another jurisdiction under conditions which the board finds equivalent to the requirements of the State of Nebraska for obtaining a license to practice dentistry and (ii) passes a jurisprudence examination based on Nebraska law and administrative rules and regulations governing the practice of dentistry and dental hygiene.

(2) An accredited school or college of dentistry shall provide input to the board annually for purposes of approving regional or state practical examinations.

(3) Any person who desires a resident license shall make application to the department. Such application shall be accompanied by the required fee.

(4) The resident license shall be issued for a period of one year and, upon application to the department, renewed annually without the licensee having to pay a renewal fee.

(5) The resident licensee shall be entitled to practice dentistry, including prescribing legend drugs and controlled substances, only under the auspices of the postgraduate or residency program in which he or she is enrolled.

(6) An applicant who is licensed pursuant to this section and has completed a postgraduate or residency program in dentistry at an accredited school or college of dentistry shall have demonstrated the applicant's skill in clinical dentistry for purposes of section 38-1117.

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 31;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 71;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 35;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-185.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 456;

Laws 2024, LB834, § 2.